District of Columbia statutes.
31-5312

Conversion of fraternal benefit society into a mutual life insurance company.

Any domestic fraternal benefit society may be converted and licensed as a mutual life insurance company by compliance with all the applicable requirements of the laws of the District with respect to similar mutual legal reserve life insurance corporations if the plan of conversion has been approved by the Commissioner. A plan of conversion shall be prepared in writing by the board of directors setting forth in full the terms and conditions of conversion. The affirmative vote of 2/3 of all members of the supreme governing body at a regular or special meeting shall be necessary for the approval of the plan. No such conversion shall take effect unless approved by the Commissioner who may grant approval if the Commissioner finds that the proposed change is in conformity with the requirements of law and not prejudicial.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1213, 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1242.